Utah statutes.
53A-11-501.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Division" means the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services
Division of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-103.
(2)  "Missing child" has the same meaning as provided in Section 26-2-27.
(3)  "State registrar" means the State Registrar of Vital Statistics within
the Department of Health.
